Oklahoma, session 2026, SB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 43-116 of Title 11, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A municipality may enter into a real estate contract for the
sale, conveyance, or exchange of real property, option to purchase
real property, or a lease with an option to purchase real property
that includes a contingency, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180)
days, for the purposes of securing required permits, lot changes,
zoning changes, and any other land use approvals necessary to use
and operate the real property.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 865.70 of Title 19, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A county may enter into a real estate contract for the sale,
conveyance, or exchange of real property, option to purchase real
property, or a lease with an option to purchase real property that
includes a contingency, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days,

for the purposes of securing required permits, lot changes, zoning
changes, and any other land use approvals necessary to use and
operate the real property.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 110.6 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The state may enter into a real estate contract for the sale,
conveyance, or exchange of real property, option to purchase real
property, or a lease with an option to purchase real property that
includes a contingency, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days,
for the purposes of securing required permits, lot changes, zoning
changes, and any other land use approvals necessary to use and
operate the real property.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 198 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 198 Page 3